zh-CN: 车辆门锁执行器接线配置: 2 线; 3 线; 4 线; 5 线主控; 5 线从控; 6 线; 其他
nl: Voertuigdeurslot actuator bedradingsconfiguratie: 2-draads; 3-draads; 4-draads; 5-draads (master); 5-draads (slave); 6-draads; Overig
hu: Járműajtó zárjának aktuátorához való kábelezés konfigurációja: 2-vezetékes; 3-vezetékes; 4-vezetékes; 5-vezetékes (vezérlő); 5-vezetékes (vezérelt); 6-vezetékes; Egyéb
sv: Konfiguration av ledningsdragning för fordonsdörrlåsets manöverdon: 2-tråds; 3-tråds; 4-tråds; 5-tråds master; 5-tråds slav; 6-tråds; Övrigt
da: Ledningskonfiguration for aktuator til bildørlås: 2-leder; 3-leder; 4-leder; 5-leder master; 5-leder slave; 6-leder; Andet
sk-SK: Konfigurácia zapojenia ovládača zámku dverí vozidla: 2-vodičové; 3-vodičové; 4-vodičové; 5-vodičové riadiace; 5-vodičové riadené; 6-vodičové; Iné
fi: Ajoneuvon oven lukon toimilaitteen johdotuskokoonpano: 2-johtiminen; 3-johtiminen; 4-johtiminen; 5-johtiminen pääyksikkö; 5-johtiminen alayksikkö; 6-johtiminen; Muu
de: Verdrahtungskonfiguration des Türschloss-Stellantriebs: 2-adrig; 3-adrig; 4-adrig; 5-adrig Master; 5-adrig Slave; 6-adrig; Sonstiges
vi: Cấu hình đấu dây bộ truyền động khóa cửa xe: 2 dây; 3 dây; 4 dây; 5 dây (chính); 5 dây (phụ); 6 dây; Khác
ja: 車両ドアロックアクチュエーター配線構成: 2 ワイヤー; 3 ワイヤー; 4 ワイヤー; 5 ワイヤーマスター; 5 ワイヤースレーブ; 6 ワイヤー; その他
it: Schema di cablaggio dell'attuatore della serratura per portiera del veicolo: A 2 fili; A 3 fili; A 4 fili; Master a 5 fili; Slave a 5 fili; A 6 fili; Altro
el: Διαμόρφωση καλωδίωσης ενεργοποιητή κλειδαριάς πόρτας οχήματος: 2 καλωδίων; 3 καλωδίων; 4 καλωδίων; Κύριος 5 καλωδίων; Δευτερεύων 5 καλωδίων; 6 καλωδίων; Άλλο
pt-PT: Configuração da cablagem do atuador do fecho da porta do veículo: 2 fios; 3 fios; 4 fios; 5 fios principal; 5 fios secundário; 6 fios; Outro
th: การกำหนดค่าการเดินสายไฟของกลไกการล็อกประตูรถยนต์: 2 สาย; 3 สาย; 4 สาย; แบบมาสเตอร์ 5 สาย; แบบสเลฟ 5 สาย; 6 สาย; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Конфигурация на окабеляването на задвижващия механизъм на автомобилна брава: 2-проводен; 3-проводен; 4-проводен; 5-проводен главен; 5-проводен подчинен; 6-проводен; Друго
zh-TW: 車門鎖致動器接線配置: 2 線; 3 線; 4 線; 5 線主控; 5 線從屬; 6 線; 其他
hr-HR: Konfiguracija ožičenja aktuatora brave na vratima vozila: 2-žilni; 3-žilni; 4-žilni; 5-žilni glavni (master); 5-žilni pomoćni (slave); 6-žilni; Ostalo
pt-BR: Atuador da fechadura da porta do veículo configuração da fiação: 2 fios; 3 fios; 4 fios; 5 fios principal (master); 5 fios secundário (slave); 6 fios; Outro
fr: Configuration du câblage de l’actionneur de serrure de porte du véhicule: À 2 fils; À 3 fils; À 4 fils; Principal à 5 fils; Secondaire à 5 fils; À 6 fils; Autre
nb: Konfigurasjon av aktuatorledninger for dørlås i kjøretøy: 2-leders; 3-leders; 4-leders; 5-leders master; 5-leders slave; 6-leders; Annet
ru: Конфигурация проводки привода замка двери автомобиля: 2-проводной; 3-проводной; 4-проводной; 5-проводной (ведущий); 5-проводной (ведомый); 6-проводной; Другое
pl: Konfiguracja okablowania siłownika zamka drzwi pojazdu: 2-żyłowa; 3-żyłowa; 4-żyłowa; 5-żyłowa (główna); 5-żyłowa (podrzędna); 6-żyłowa; Inne
ko: 차량 도어 잠금장치 액추에이터 배선 구성: 2와이어; 3와이어; 4와이어; 5와이어 마스터; 5와이어 슬레이브; 6와이어; 기타
es: Configuración del cableado del actuador de la cerradura de la puerta del vehículo: 2 cables; 3 cables; 4 cables; Maestro de 5 cables; Esclavo de 5 cables; 6 cables; Otro
lt-LT: Transporto priemonės durų užrakto pavaros laidų konfigūracija: 2 laidų; 3 laidų; 4 laidų; 5 laidų pagrindinis; 5 laidų pagalbinis; 6 laidų; Kita
ro-RO: Configurația cablajului dispozitivului de acționare al încuietorii ușii vehiculului: Cu 2 fire; Cu 3 fire; Cu 4 fire; Master cu 5 fire; Slave cu 5 fire; Cu 6 fire; Altele
cs: Konfigurace zapojení ovladače zámku dveří vozidla: 2vodičové; 3vodičové; 4vodičové; 5vodičové řídicí; 5vodičové podřízené; 6vodičové; Jiné
sl-SI: Konfiguracija ožičenja sprožilca za zaklepanje vrat vozila: 2-žilni; 3-žilni; 4-žilni; 5-žilni (glavni); 5-žilni (podrejeni); 6-žilni; Drugo
en: Vehicle door lock actuator wiring configuration: 2-wire; 3-wire; 4-wire; 5-wire master; 5-wire slave; 6-wire; Other
tr: Araç kapı kilidi aktüatör kablolama konfigürasyonu: 2 telli; 3 telli; 4 telli; 5 telli ana (master); 5 telli bağımlı (slave); 6 telli; Diğer